Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,132
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska Operational Assistance Act is to create a program to assist business enterprises in Nebraska in achieving the thresholds necessary for private equity investments.

Laws 2007, LB425, § 4.